Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB376.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 42.500 is amended to read as follows:
(1) There shall be a State Investment Commission composed of:
(a) The State Treasurer who shall be chairman;
(b) The secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet;
(c) The state controller; and
(d) Two (2) persons appointed by the Governor.
(2) The individuals appointed by the Governor shall be selected as follows:
(a) One (1) to be selected from a list of five (5) submitted to the Governor by the
Kentucky Bankers Association;[,] and
(b) One (1) to be selected from a list of five (5) submitted to the Governor by the
Independent Community Bankers Association.
(3) (a) The State Investment Commission shall meet at least quarterly to review
investment performance and conduct other business.
(b) This subsection[provision] shall not prohibit the commission from meeting
more frequently as the need arises.
(4) (a) The State Treasurer and secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet
shall each have the authority to designate, by an instrument in writing over his
or her signature and filed with the secretary of the commission as a public
record of the commission, an alternate with full authority to:
1.[(a)] Attend in the member's absence, for any reason, any properly
convened meeting of the commission; and
2.[(b)] Participate in the consideration of, and vote upon, business and
transactions of the commission.
(b) Each alternate designated under this subsection shall be a person on the staff
of the appointing member or in the employ of the appointing member's state
Page 1 of 39
XXXX 2/3/2025 1:11 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1321
agency or department.
(5) Any designation of an alternate under subsection (4) of this section may, at the
appointing member's direction:
(a) Be limited upon the face of the appointing instrument to be effective for only
a specific meeting or specified business;
(b) Be shown on the face of the appointing instrument to be a continuing
designation, for a period of no more than four (4) years, whenever the
appointing member is unable to attend; or
(c) Be revoked at any time by the appointing member in an instrument in writing,
over his or her signature, filed with the secretary of the commission as a
public record of the commission.
(6) (a) Any person transacting business with, or materially affected by, the business
of the commission may accept and rely upon a joint certificate of the secretary
of the commission and any member of the commission concerning the
designation of any alternate, the time and scope of the designation, and, if it is
of a continuing nature, whether and when the designation has been revoked.
(b) The joint certificate shall be made and delivered to the person requesting it
within a reasonable time after it has been requested in writing, with acceptable
identification of the business or transaction to which it refers and the
requesting person's interest in the business or transaction.
(7) (a) Any three (3) persons who are members of the commission or alternates
authorized under subsections (4) and (5) of this section shall constitute a
quorum and may, by majority vote, transact any business of the commission.
(b) Any three (3) members of the commission may call a meeting.
(8) The provisions of KRS 61.070 shall not apply to members of the commission.
(9) Subject to subsection (11) of this section, the commission shall have authority and
may, if in its opinion the cash in the State Treasury is in excess of the amount
Page 2 of 39
XXXX 2/3/2025 1:11 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1321
required to meet current expenditures, invest any and all of the excess cash in:
(a) Obligations and contracts for future delivery of obligations backed by the full
faith and credit of the United States or a United States government agency,
including but not limited to:
1. United States Treasury;
2. Export-Import Bank of the United States;
3. [Farmers Home Administration;
4. ]Government National Mortgage Corporation; and
4.[5.] Merchant Marine bonds;
(b) Obligations of any corporation of the United States government or
government-sponsored enterprise, including but not limited to:
1. Federal Home Loan Mortgage Corporation;
2. Federal Farm credit banks and [:
a. ]Bank for cooperatives;[
b. Federal Intermediate Credit Banks; and
c. Federal Land Banks;]
3. Federal Home Loan Banks;
4. Federal National Mortgage Association; and
5. Tennessee Valley Authority obligations;
(c) Collateralized or uncollateralized certificates of deposit, issued by banks rated
in one (1) of the three (3) highest categories by a nationally recognized
statistical rating organization or other interest-bearing accounts in depository
institutions chartered by this state or by the United States, except for shares in
mutual savings banks;
(d) Bankers acceptances for banks rated in the highest short-term category by a
nationally recognized statistical rating organization;
(e) Commercial paper rated in the highest short-term category by a nationally
Page 3 of 39
XXXX 2/3/2025 1:11 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1321
recognized statistical rating organization;
(f) Securities issued by a state or local government, or any instrumentality or
agency thereof, in the United States, and rated in one (1) of the three (3)
highest long-term categories by a nationally recognized statistical rating
organization;
(g) United States denominated corporate, Yankee, and Eurodollar securities,
excluding corporate stocks, issued by foreign and domestic issuers, including
sovereign and supranational governments, rated in one (1) of the three (3)
highest long-term categories by a nationally recognized statistical rating
organization;
(h) Asset-backed securities rated in the highest category by a nationally
recognized statistical rating organization;
(i) Shares of mutual funds, each of which shall have the following
characteristics:
1. The mutual fund shall be an open-end diversified investment company
registered under the federal Investment Company Act of 1940, as
amended;
2. The management company of the investment company shall have been
in operation for at least five (5) years;
3. The mutual fund shall be rated in the highest category by a nationally
recognized statistical rating organization; and
4. All of the securities in the mutual fund shall be eligible investments
pursuant to this section;[ and]
(j) State and local delinquent property tax claims which upon purchase shall
become certificates of delinquency secured by interests in real property not to
exceed twenty-five million dollars ($25,000,000) in the aggregate. For any
certificates of delinquency that have been exonerated pursuant to KRS
Page 4 of 39
XXXX 2/3/2025 1:11 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1321
132.220(5), the Department of Revenue shall offset the loss suffered by the
Finance and Administration Cabinet against subsequent local distributions to
the affected taxing districts as shown on the certificate of delinquency;[.]
(k) Digital assets, other than stablecoins, that:
1. Have a market capitalization of over seven hundred fifty billion
dollars ($750,000,000,000) averaged over the previous calendar year;
and
2. Are held:
a. Directly by the commission or the commission's designee
through the use of a secure custody solution;
b. On behalf of the state by a qualified custodian; or
c. In the form of an exchange traded product issued by an
investment company registered under the federal Investment
Company Act of 1940, as amended;
(l) Stablecoins that have received appropriate regulatory approval or
authorization from the competent authorities of the United States or any
state of the United States; and
(m) Bullion that is held:
1. In the form of an exchange traded product; or
2. In physical form by:
a. A qualified custodian;
b. The state; or
c. The state in conjunction with another state in accordance with
an administrative regulation promulgated by the commission
under Section 2 of this Act.
(10) As used in this section:
(a) "Bullion":
Page 5 of 39
XXXX 2/3/2025 1:11 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1321
1. Means bars, ingots, or coins, which are:
a. Made of gold, silver, platinum, palladium, or a combination of
these metals;
b. Valued based on the content of the metal and not its form; and
c. Used, or have been used, as a medium of exchange, security, or
commodity by any state, the United States government, or a
foreign nation; and
2. Does not include medallions or coins that are incorporated into a
pendant or other jewelry;
(b) "Central bank digital currency":
1. Means a digital currency, digital medium of exchange, or digital
monetary unit of account that is:
a. Issued and made directly available to the public; or
b. Processed or validated;
by the United States Federal Reserve System, a federal agency, or a
foreign government; and
2. Does not include a digital asset that is:
a. Backed by legal tender or government treasuries; and
b. Issued by a qualified entity;
(c) 1. "Digital asset":
a. Except as provided in subdivision b. of this subparagraph, means
virtual currency, cryptocurrencies, natively electronic assets, or
other digital-only assets that confer economic, proprietary, or
access rights or powers; and
b. Does not include central bank digital currency.
2. As used in this paragraph, "natively electronic asset" includes a
stablecoin and a nonfungible token;
Page 6 of 39
XXXX 2/3/2025 1:11 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1321
(d) "Exchange traded product" means any financial instrument that:
1. Is approved or registered:
a. By the Securities and Exchange Commission or Commodity
Futures Trading Commission; or
b. Under KRS Chapter 292;
2. Is traded on a United States-regulated exchange; and
3. Derives its value from an underlying pool of assets including but not
limited to stocks, bonds, commodities, and indexes;
(e) "Qualified custodian" means any:
1. Federal or state-chartered bank, trust company, or special purpose
depository institution; or
2. State-regulated company that provides custody of digital assets for an
exchange traded product;
(f) "Qualified entity" means an entity that is not:
1. The United States Federal Reserve System;
2. A federal agency;
3. A foreign government; or
4. An instrumentality or agent of an entity referenced in subparagraph
1., 2., or 3. of this paragraph;
(g) 1. "Secure custody solution" means a technological product or blended
technological product and service:
a. That secures digital assets with cryptographic private keys that
are:
i. Exclusively known and accessible by the commission or the
commission's designee;
ii. Exclusively contained within an encrypted environment
and accessible only via end-to-end encrypted channels;
Page 7 of 39
XXXX 2/3/2025 1:11 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1321
iii. Never contained or accessible by or controllable via a
smartphone; and
iv. Stored on hardware that is maintained in at least two (2)
geographically diversified specially designated secure data
centers; and
b. Where the provider of the product, or blended product and
service, complies with or ensures compliance with the following
protocols for the product or blended product and service:
i. Enforces a multiparty governance structure for authorizing
transactions;
ii. Enforces user access controls;
iii. Logs all user-initiated actions;
iv. Has implemented a disaster recovery protocol that ensures
access to assets in the event the provider becomes
unavailable;
v. Undergoes regular code audits and penetration testing
from audit firms; and
vi. Remedies any vulnerabilities identified in an audit or test
referenced in subpart v. of this subdivision promptly.
2. As used in this paragraph, "private key" means a unique element of
cryptographic data that is:
a. Used for signing transactions on a blockchain; and
b. Known to the owner of the unique element; and
(h) "Stablecoin" means a natively electronic asset that is:
1. Issued by a qualified entity that is backed by United States dollars or
high-quality liquid assets; and
2. Redeemable on demand by the holder at par for a fixed monetary
Page 8 of 39
XXXX 2/3/2025 1:11 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1321
value in equivalent United States dollars[The State Investment
Commission shall promulgate administrative regulations for the
investment and reinvestment of state funds in shares of mutual funds,
and the regulations shall specify:
(a) The long and short term goals of any investment;
(b) The specification of moneys to be invested;
(c) The amount of funds which may be invested per instrument;
(d) The qualifications of instruments; and
(e) The acceptable maturity of investments].
(11) (a) The total amount of excess cash invested under subsection (9)(k), (l), and
(m) of this section shall not, at the time of the investment is made, exceed
ten percent (10%) of the total amount of excess cash invested under
subsection (9) of this section.
(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section or any other law, the
commission shall not invest any excess cash or other funds in central bank
digital currency.
(12) Any investment in obligations and securities pursuant to[ subsection (9) of] this
section may be[shall satisfy this section if these obligations are] subject to
repurchase agreements, provided that delivery of these obligations is taken either
directly or through an authorized custodian.
(13)[(12)] (a) Income earned from investments made pursuant to this section shall
accrue to the credit of the investment income account of the general fund,
except that interest from investments of excess cash in the road fund shall be
credited to the surplus account of the road fund and interest from investments
of excess cash in the game and fish fund shall be credited to the game and fish
fund, interest earned from investments of imprest cash funds and funds in the
trust and revolving fund for each state public university shall be credited to
Page 9 of 39
XXXX 2/3/2025 1:11 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1321
the appropriate institutional account, and interest earned from the investment
of funds accumulated solely by means of contributions and gifts shall not be
diverted to any purpose other than that stipulated by the donor, when the
donor shall have designated the use to which the interest shall be placed.
(b) Except as otherwise provided by law, or by the obligations and covenants
contained in resolutions and trust indentures adopted or entered into for state
bond issues, interest earned from the investment of moneys appropriated to
the capital construction accounts, trust and agency accounts, and trust and
agency revolving accounts shall accrue to the capital construction investment
income account.
(c) 1. If there is a revenue shortfall, as defined in KRS 48.010, of five percent
(5%) or less, the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet,
upon the recommendation of the state budget director, may direct the
transfer of excess unappropriated capital construction investment
income to the general fund investment income account.
2. The amount of the transfer shall not exceed the amount of the shortfall
in general fund revenues.
(d) 1. If the capital construction investment income is less than that amount
appropriated by the General Assembly, the secretary of the Finance and
Administration Cabinet may, upon recommendation of the state budget
director, direct the transfer of excess unappropriated general fund
investment income to the capital construction investment income
account.
2. The transfer of general fund investment income revenues to the capital
construction investment income account shall be made only when the
actual general fund revenues are in excess of the enacted estimates
under KRS 48.120 and shall be limited to the amount of the excess
Page 10 of 39
XXXX 2/3/2025 1:11 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1321
general fund revenues.
3. The amount of the transfer shall not exceed the amount of the shortfall
in the capital construction fund revenues.
(14)[(13)] The authority granted by this section to the[ State Investment] commission
shall not extend to any funds that are specifically provided by law to be invested by
some other officer or agency of the state government.
(15)[(14)] The authority granted by this section to the[ State Investment] commission
shall only be exercised pursuant to the administrative regulations mandated by KRS
42.525.
(16)[(15)] Each member of the[ State Investment] commission shall post bond for his or
her acts or omissions as a member thereof identical in amount and kind to that
posted by the State Treasurer.
Section 2. KRS 42.525 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The State Investment Commission shall promulgate administrative regulations for
the investment and reinvestment of state funds and the acquisition, retention,
management, and disposition of investments.
(2) The administrative regulations required under subsection (1) of this section shall:
(a) Specify:
1.[(a)] The long and short term goals of any investment;
2.[(b)] The specification of moneys to be invested;
3.[(c)] The amount of funds which may be invested per instrument;
4.[(d)] The qualifications of instruments;
5.[(e)] The acceptable maturity of investments;
6.[(f)] The investment procedure with respect to in-state and out-of-state
depositories provided that funds available for investment shall be
offered first to qualified Kentucky depositories consistent with the
investment guidelines; and
Page 11 of 39
XXXX 2/3/2025 1:11 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1321
7.[(g)] The distribution method of funds among types of institutions; and
(b) Set forth the requirements provided in paragraph (a)1. to 5. of this
subsection for the investment and reinvestment of state funds in shares of
mutual funds.
(3) The commission may promulgate any other administrative regulations to carry
out and effectuate subsections (9)(k), (l), and (m), (10), and (11) of Section 1 of
this Act.
SECTION 3. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 42 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section, "exchange traded product" has the same meaning as in
of Section 1 of this Act.
(2) Notwithstanding any other law:
(a) Any state retirement fund may invest, or be invested, in exchange traded
products; and
(b) Any deferred compensation plan offered by the state or any state agency
may offer participants of the plan the option to invest in exchange traded
products.
Section 4. KRS 45.345 is amended to read as follows:
(1) As used in this section, the following terms have the same meaning as in Section
1 of this Act:
(a) "Bullion";
(b) "Central bank digital currency";
(c) "Digital asset"; and
(d) "Exchange traded product."
(2) In addition to any payment method authorized by law[,] and notwithstanding any
statute to the contrary, except as otherwise provided in this section and Section 5
of this Act, any state agency may accept the following methods of payment to
Page 12 of 39
XXXX 2/3/2025 1:11 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1321
secure funds for deposit into the State Treasury:
(a) Credit card;
(b) Debit card;
(c) Electronic check;
(d) Automated clearinghouse (ACH) debit;[ or]
(e) Digital assets;
(f) Bullion, when in the form of an exchange traded product; or
(g) Any other electronic payment method not prohibited under subsection (4) of
this section, upon the prior written approval of both the Finance and
Administration Cabinet and the Office of the State Treasurer.
(3)[(2)] Any fees charged to a state agency by the provider of the payment services
listed in subsection (1) of this section shall be deemed to represent collection
expenses and may be considered normal operating expenses of the agency, or the
agency may collect convenience fees from users to supplement agency costs of
delivering services.
(4) A state agency shall not, either directly or through any of the methods listed in
subsection (2)(a), (b), (c), or (d) of this section or through another method, accept
central bank digital currency as payment to secure funds for deposit into the State
Treasury or for any other purpose.
SECTION 5. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 131 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section, the following terms have the same meaning as in Section
1 of this Act:
(a) "Bullion";
(b) "Central bank digital currency";
(c) "Digital asset"; and
(d) "Exchange traded product."
Page 13 of 39
XXXX 2/3/2025 1:11 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1321
(2) (a) Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection, in
addition to any payment method authorized by law, the department may
accept any method of payment authorized under Section 4 of this Act to
secure funds for payment of any tax bill issued by the department.
(b) The department shall accept all of the following as a method of payment to
secure funds for payment of any tax bill issued by the department:
1. Digital assets; and
2. Bullion, when in the form of an exchange traded product.
(3) This section shall not apply to sheriffs, county clerks, or any other local
government entity that collects payments on behalf of the department.
(4) When accepting payments in accordance with this section, the department may
collect convenience fees in accordance with subsection (3) of Section 4 of this
Act.
Section 6. KRS 41.070 is amended to read as follows:
(1) As used in this section, the following terms have the same meaning as in Section
1 of this Act:
(a) "Central bank digital currency";
(b) "Digital asset"; and
(c) "Stablecoin."
(2) Unless otherwise expressly provided by law, no receipts from any source of state
money or money for which the state is responsible shall be held, used, or deposited
in any personal or special bank account, temporarily or otherwise, by any agent or
employee of any budget unit, to meet expenditures or for any other purpose.
(3)[(2)] (a) All receipts of any character of any budget unit, all revenue collected for
the state, and all public money and dues to the state shall be deposited in state
depositories in the most prompt and cost-efficient manner available.
(b) However, in the case of state departments or agencies located outside
Page 14 of 39
XXXX 2/3/2025 1:11 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1321
Frankfort, and all state institutions, the Finance and Administration Cabinet
may permit temporary deposits to be made to the accounts maintained by the
agency, department, or institution in a state depository for a period not to
exceed thirty (30) days, and may require that the money be forwarded to the
State Treasury at the time and in the manner and form prescribed by the
cabinet.
(c) [Nothing in ]This section shall not be construed as authorizing any
representative of any agency, department, or institution to enforce or cash,
even for the purpose of a deposit, any check or other instrument of value
payable to the Commonwealth or any agency thereof.
(4)[(3)] Each agency depositing its receipts directly with the State Treasurer shall do
so in the manner approved by the State Treasurer as agent in charge of public fund
deposits.
(5)[(4)] (a) The Department of Revenue may deposit receipts to the credit of the
State Treasury directly with a state depository utilized by the Commonwealth
for its primary banking services.
(b) 1. The State Treasurer, with the approval of the Finance and
Administration Cabinet, may authorize other agencies to deposit receipts
directly with a state depository to the credit of the State Treasury if the
Treasurer prescribes the manner in which the deposit is to be made, and
the forms and reports to be filed with the Treasury Department.
2. The Finance and Administration Cabinet shall prescribe the forms and
reports to be filed with it when this type of deposit is made.
(6)[(5)] Each department, agency, or other budget unit which receives funds to be
deposited into the State Treasury shall maintain records to report adequately each
amount received, from whom received, and date received. Agency records shall be
easily reconcilable with the information forwarded to the State Treasurer.
Page 15 of 39
XXXX 2/3/2025 1:11 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1321
(7) (a) When a department, agency, or other budget unit deposits a receipt of the
following with a state depository, the State Treasurer, or to the credit of the
State Treasury, the State Treasurer shall transfer the digital assets,
including stablecoins, to the budget reserve trust fund account established
in Section 7 of this Act, which shall reimburse the fund to which the digital
assets, including stablecoins, were designated with United States currency:
1. Digital assets, other than stablecoins, having a market capitalization
of over seven hundred fifty billion dollars ($750,000,000,000)
averaged over the previous calendar year; or
2. Stablecoins.
(b) When a department, agency, or other budget unit deposits a receipt of
digital assets other than those referenced in paragraph (a)1. and 2. of this
subsection with a state depository, the State Treasurer, or to the credit of the
State Treasury, the State Treasurer shall:
1. Immediately convert the digital assets to United States currency; and
2. Transfer the United States currency to the fund to which the digital
assets were designated.
(8) The State Treasurer shall not, under this section or any other law:
(a) Accept or authorize receipts or deposits of central bank digital currency; or
(b) Convert digital assets or any other receipts or deposits to central bank
digital currency.
Section 7. KRS 48.705 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A budget reserve trust fund account is hereby created in the general fund, pursuant
to KRS 45.305. The budget reserve trust fund account shall be funded through
direct appropriations, and surplus amounts as provided in subsection (2) of this
section. Moneys in the account shall remain unallotted unless required by the
provisions of this section.
Page 16 of 39
XXXX 2/3/2025 1:11 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1321
(2) (a) Each fiscal year, except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, within
thirty (30) days of the end of the fiscal year, the secretary of the Finance and
Administration Cabinet shall cause to be deposited to the budget reserve trust
fund account the lesser of the following amounts:
1. Fifty percent (50%) of the general fund surplus; or
2. The amount necessary from the general fund surplus to make the
balance of the budget reserve trust fund account equal to five percent
(5%) of the actual general fund receipts collected during the fiscal year
just ended, as determined by the Finance and Administration Cabinet.
(b) Any amounts to be deposited to the budget reserve trust fund account from the
general fund surplus shall be determined after the surplus has been reduced by
the amount necessary to implement the provisions of any surplus expenditure
plan authorized by KRS 48.140 and enacted as a part of a branch budget bill.
(3) If, at the close of any fiscal year, the budget reserve trust fund account has a balance
equal to or greater than five percent (5%) of the actual general fund receipts
collected during the fiscal year just ended, as determined by the Finance and
Administration Cabinet, the deposits required under subsection (2) of this section
shall be suspended for that year.
(4) Moneys in the budget reserve trust fund account may be appropriated by the
General Assembly in a regular or special session.
(5) Before authorizing any allotments from the budget reserve trust fund account, the
secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet shall notify in writing the
Interim Joint Committee on Appropriations and Revenue. The notice shall include
the amount and purpose for the proposed allotment.
(6) Within thirty (30) days of the close of each fiscal year, the secretary of the Finance
and Administration Cabinet shall report to the Interim Joint Committee on
Appropriations and Revenue the general fund receipts collected for the fiscal year
Page 17 of 39
XXXX 2/3/2025 1:11 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1321
just ended, the balance of the budget reserve trust fund account, and any amounts
deposited to the budget reserve trust fund account pursuant to the provisions of
subsection (2) of this section.
(7) All sums appropriated or deposited to the budget reserve trust fund account shall
not lapse at the close of the fiscal year but shall carry forward into the next fiscal
year.
(8) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section or any other law, the budget
reserve trust fund account shall make reimbursements in accordance with
subsection (7)(a) of Section 6 of this Act.
Section 8. KRS 16.642 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The board shall be the trustee of funds created by KRS 16.505 to 16.652 and KRS
61.701 and shall have full power to invest and reinvest such assets in accordance
with federal law.
(2) The board, through adopted written policies, shall maintain ownership and control
over its assets held in its unitized managed custodial account.
(3) The board, in keeping with its responsibility as trustee and wherever feasible, shall
give priority to the investment of funds in obligations calculated to improve the
industrial development and enhance the economic welfare of the Commonwealth.
(4) The investment committee established pursuant to KRS 61.650 shall serve as the
investment committee of the funds established by KRS 16.505 to 16.652.
(5) (a) Based upon market value at the time of purchase, the board shall limit the
amount of assets managed by any one (1) active or passive investment
manager to fifteen percent (15%) of the assets in the pension and insurance
funds.
(b) The board may invest fund assets in exchange traded products as defined in
Section 1 of this Act.
Section 9. KRS 18A.255 is amended to read as follows:
Page 18 of 39
XXXX 2/3/2025 1:11 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1321
(1) (a) Notwithstanding any other provision of KRS 18A.230 to 18A.275, funds held
for the State of Kentucky public employees deferred compensation trust fund
pursuant to agreement between the state and participating employees may be
invested in such investments as are deemed appropriate by the trustees,
including but not limited to:
1. Annuity contracts; and
2. Exchange traded products as defined in Section 1 of this Act.
(b) Agreements may be made in writing or by electronic record, signature, or
contract as determined by the authority in accordance with the provisions of
KRS 369.101 to 369.120 and shall not be denied legal effect or enforceability
if made electronically to the extent permitted by the authority.
(2) (a) Funds deposited to the credit of the trust fund from payroll deductions made
pursuant to KRS 18A.250 shall be temporarily invested as provided in KRS
42.500 until such funds are invested pursuant to the deferred compensation
agreements between the state and participating employees and actually
credited to accounts for plan participants.
(b) Notwithstanding KRS 42.500, interest earned from such temporary
investments shall be used to defray the expenses of administering the deferred
compensation system.
(3) (a) Neither the authority nor the board shall be liable for any losses or claims due
to a participant's actions in connection with the investment advice or financial
planning provided to the participant by operation of KRS 18A.245(7)(f) or
otherwise.
(b) The authority and board shall have no duty or obligation to monitor, review,
or assess the specific investment advice or financial planning provided to a
participant.
Section 10. KRS 21.550 is amended to read as follows:
Page 19 of 39
XXXX 2/3/2025 1:11 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1321
(1) (a) Those members of the board of trustees of the Judicial Form Retirement
System who are appointed by the Supreme Court, together with the members
appointed by the Governor, shall constitute an investment committee for the
Judicial Retirement Plan, and as such shall have full and sole authority over
the judicial retirement fund and the investment thereof, including the
prescribing of funding standards, the adoption of actuarial methods and
assumptions, and the making of employments or contracts for required
personal services, including administrative, actuarial, and investment
counseling services.
(b) The committee shall be considered trustee of the judicial retirement fund and
shall have the sole authority to make investment transactions or obtain
insurance contracts for funding purposes.
(c) The fund shall be invested in securities which, at the time of making the
investment, are by law permitted for the investment of funds by fiduciaries in
this state.[, or ]
(d) Funding may be accomplished in part by contract with a reputable life
insurance company authorized to do business in this state.
(e) To the extent that funding is provided through insurance contract, no
contributions, payments, or premiums shall be subject to any tax on insurance
premiums or annuity considerations.
(f) The committee may invest fund assets in exchange traded products as
defined in Section 1 of this Act.
(2) (a) The investment committee for the judicial retirement fund shall appoint one
(1) or more custodians of the securities acquired under authority of this
section, each of whom shall be responsible for the safekeeping of the
securities in his or her custody.
(b) All registered securities shall be registered in the name "Kentucky Judicial
Page 20 of 39
XXXX 2/3/2025 1:11 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1321
Retirement Fund" (securities heretofore registered in the name "Kentucky
Judicial Retirement System" may continue in that name), or in nominee name
as provided comparably in KRS 286.3-225, and every change in registration,
by reason of sale or assignment of such securities, shall be accomplished by
the signatures of the chairman of the investment committee or a member of
that committee appointed by the chairman, and by the secretary-treasurer of
the fund.
Section 11. KRS 61.650 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) The board shall be the trustee of funds created by KRS 16.510, 61.515, and
61.701 pertaining to the accounts for the Kentucky Employees Retirement
System or State Police Retirement System, notwithstanding the provisions of
any other statute to the contrary, and shall have exclusive power to invest and
reinvest such assets in accordance with federal law.
(b) 1. The board shall establish an investment committee whose membership
shall be composed of the following:
a. The three (3) trustees of the Kentucky Retirement Systems board
appointed by the Governor pursuant to KRS 61.645 who have
investment experience; and
b. Additional trustees appointed by the board chair.
2. The investment committee shall have authority to implement the
investment policies adopted by the board and act on behalf of the board
on all investment-related matters and to acquire, sell, safeguard,
monitor, and manage the assets and securities of the several funds.
(c) 1. For the purposes of this paragraph:
a. "Solely in the interest of the members and beneficiaries" shall be
determined using only pecuniary factors and shall not include any
purpose to further a nonpecuniary interest;
Page 21 of 39
XXXX 2/3/2025 1:11 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1321
b. "Pecuniary factor" means a consideration having a direct and
material connection to the financial risk or financial return of an
investment;
c. A "material connection" is established if there is a substantial
likelihood that a reasonable investor would consider it important in
determining the financial risk or the financial return of an
investment;
d. "Nonpecuniary interest" includes but is not limited to an
environmental, social, political, or ideological interest which does
not have a direct and material connection to the financial risk or
financial return of an investment; and
e. "Investment manager" shall have the same definition attributed to
"investment adviser" under the federal Investment Advisers Act of
1940, 15 U.S.C. sec. 80b-2.
2. A trustee, officer, employee, employee of the Kentucky Public Pensions
Authority, investment manager, or other fiduciary, or proxy adviser shall
discharge duties with respect to the retirement system:
a. Solely in the interest of the members and beneficiaries;
b. For the exclusive purpose of providing benefits to members and
beneficiaries and paying reasonable expenses of administering the
system;
c. With the care, skill, and caution under the circumstances then
prevailing that a prudent person acting in a like capacity and
familiar with those matters would use in the conduct of an activity
of like character and purpose;
d. Impartially, taking into account any differing interests of members
and beneficiaries;
Page 22 of 39
XXXX 2/3/2025 1:11 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1321
e. Incurring any costs that are appropriate and reasonable; and
f. In accordance with a good-faith interpretation of the federal, state,
and common law governing the system and fiduciaries.
3. Evidence that a fiduciary has considered or acted on a nonpecuniary
interest shall include but is not limited to:
a. Statements, explanations, reports, or correspondence;
b. Communications with portfolio companies;
c. Statements of principles or policies, whether made individually or
jointly;
d. Votes of shares or proxies; or
e. Coalitions, initiatives, agreements, or commitments to which the
fiduciary is a participant, affiliate, or signatory.
(d) In addition to the standards of conduct prescribed by paragraph (c) of this
subsection:
1. All internal investment staff of the Kentucky Public Pensions Authority,
and investment consultants shall adhere to the Code of Ethics and
Standards of Professional Conduct, and all board trustees shall adhere to
the Code of Conduct for Members of a Pension Scheme Governing
Body. All codes cited in this subparagraph are promulgated by the CFA
Institute;
2. Investment managers shall comply with all applicable provisions of the
federal Investment Advisers Act of 1940, as amended, and the rules and
regulations promulgated thereunder, and shall comply with all other
applicable federal securities statutes and related rules and regulations
that apply to investment managers; and
3. Proxy advisers and proxy voting services shall comply with all
applicable provisions of the Investment Advisers Act of 1940, as
Page 23 of 39
XXXX 2/3/2025 1:11 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1321
amended, and the rules and regulations promulgated thereunder, and
shall comply with all other federal statutes and related rules and
regulations that apply to proxy advisers and proxy voting services.
(e) No contract or agreement, whether made in writing or not, shall in any
manner waive, restrict, or limit a fiduciary's liability as to any of the duties
imposed by this section. Any agreement shall specify that it is made in the
Commonwealth and governed by the laws of the Commonwealth.
(2) The board, through adopted written policies, shall maintain ownership and control
over its assets held in its unitized managed custodial account.
(3) The board, in keeping with its responsibility as trustee and wherever consistent with
its fiduciary responsibilities, shall give priority to the investment of funds in
obligation calculated to improve the industrial development and enhance the
economic welfare of the Commonwealth.
(4) The contents of real estate appraisals, engineering or feasibility estimates, and
evaluations made by or for the system relative to the acquisition or disposition of
property, until such time as all of the property has been acquired or sold, shall be
excluded from the application of KRS 61.870 to 61.884 and shall be subject to
inspection only upon order of a court of competent jurisdiction.
(5) (a) Based upon market value at the time of purchase, the board shall limit the
amount of assets managed by any one (1) active or passive investment
manager to fifteen percent (15%) of the assets in the pension and insurance
funds.
(b) The board may invest fund assets in exchange traded products as defined in
Section 1 of this Act.
(6) All contracts for the investment or management of assets of the systems shall not be
subject to KRS Chapters 45, 45A, 56, and 57. Instead, the board shall conduct the
following process to develop and adopt an investment procurement policy with
Page 24 of 39
XXXX 2/3/2025 1:11 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1321
which all prospective contracts for the investment or management of assets of the
systems shall comply:
(a) On or before July 1, 2017, the board shall consult with the secretary of the
Finance and Administration Cabinet or his or her designee to develop an
investment procurement policy, which shall be written to meet best practices
in investment management procurement;
(b) Thirty (30) days prior to adoption, the board shall tender the preliminary
investment procurement policy to the secretary of the Finance and
Administration Cabinet or his or her designee for review and comment;
(c) Upon receipt of comments from the secretary of the Finance and
Administration Cabinet or his or her designee, the board shall choose to adopt
or not adopt any recommended changes;
(d) Upon adoption, the board shall tender the final investment procurement policy
to the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet or his or her
designee;
(e) No later than thirty (30) days after receipt of the investment procurement
policy, the secretary or his or her designee shall certify whether the board's
investment procurement policy meets or does not meet best practices for
investment management procurement; and
(f) Any amendments to the investment procurement policy shall adhere to the
requirements set forth by paragraphs (b) to (e) of this subsection.
(7) (a) The board shall adopt written proxy voting guidelines which are consistent
with the fiduciary duties and other requirements of this section.
(b) The board shall not adopt the recommendations of a proxy adviser or proxy
voting service and shall not allow such proxy adviser or proxy voting service
to vote on behalf of the system, unless the proxy adviser or proxy voting
service acknowledges in writing and accepts under contract its duties under
Page 25 of 39
XXXX 2/3/2025 1:11 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1321
this section and commits to follow the board-adopted proxy voting guidelines
when voting the system's shares in order to comply with the board's fiduciary
duties and other responsibilities under this section.
(c) All shares held by or on behalf of the system, and which the system is entitled
to vote under state, federal, or common laws, shall be voted according to the
proxy voting guidelines adopted by the board and subject to the fiduciary
duties and other requirements of this section by:
1. The board, the investment committee of the board, or an employee or
employees of the Authority who are fiduciaries under subsection (1) of
this section and are appointed or otherwise authorized by the board; or
2. A proxy adviser or proxy voting service that acknowledges in writing
and accepts under contract its duties under this section and commits to
follow the board-adopted proxy voting guidelines when voting the
system's shares in order to comply with the board's fiduciary duties and
other responsibilities under this section.
(d) All proxy votes shall be reported at least quarterly to the board. For each vote,
the report shall provide:
1. The vote caption;
2. The date of the vote;
3. The company's name;
4. The vote cast for the system;
5. The recommendation of the company's management; and
6. If applicable, the recommendation of the proxy adviser or proxy voting
service.
Section 12. KRS 78.790 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) The board shall be the trustee of funds pertaining to the County Employees
Retirement System created by KRS 78.510 to 78.852, and KRS 61.701, and
Page 26 of 39
XXXX 2/3/2025 1:11 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1321
shall have full and exclusive power to invest and reinvest such assets in
accordance with federal law.
(b) 1. The board shall establish an investment committee that shall include
members of the board with investment experience, elected members, or
other members as determined by the board chair, and may also include
nonvoting members who have investment expertise.
2. The investment committee shall have authority to implement the
investment policies adopted by the board and act on behalf of the board
on all investment-related matters.
(c) 1. For the purposes of this paragraph:
a. "Solely in the interest of the members and beneficiaries" shall be
determined using only pecuniary factors and shall not include any
purpose to further a nonpecuniary interest;
b. "Pecuniary factor" means a consideration having a direct and
material connection to the financial risk or financial return of an
investment;
c. A "material connection" is established if there is a substantial
likelihood that a reasonable investor would consider it important in
determining the financial risk or the financial return of an
investment;
d. "Nonpecuniary interest" includes but is not limited to an
environmental, social, political, or ideological interest which does
not have a direct and material connection to the financial risk or
financial return of an investment; and
e. "Investment manager" shall have the same definition attributed to
"investment adviser" under the federal Investment Advisers Act of
1940, 15 U.S.C. sec. 80b-2.
Page 27 of 39
XXXX 2/3/2025 1:11 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1321
2. A trustee, officer, employee, employee of the Kentucky Public Pensions
Authority, investment manager, or other fiduciary, or proxy adviser shall
discharge duties with respect to the system:
a. Solely in the interest of the members and beneficiaries;
b. For the exclusive purpose of providing benefits to members and
beneficiaries and paying reasonable expenses of administering the
system;
c. With the care, skill, and caution under the circumstances then
prevailing that a prudent person acting in a like capacity and
familiar with those matters would use in the conduct of an activity
of like character and purpose;
d. Impartially, taking into account any differing interests of members
and beneficiaries;
e. Incurring any costs that are appropriate and reasonable; and
f. In accordance with a good-faith interpretation of the federal, state,
and common law governing the system and fiduciaries.
3. Evidence that a fiduciary has considered or acted on a nonpecuniary
interest shall include but is not limited to:
a. Statements, explanations, reports, or correspondence;
b. Communications with portfolio companies;
c. Statements of principles or policies, whether made individually or
jointly;
d. Votes of shares or proxies; or
e. Coalitions, initiatives, agreements, or commitments to which the
fiduciary is a participant, affiliate, or signatory.
(d) In addition to the standards of conduct prescribed by paragraph (c) of this
subsection:
Page 28 of 39
XXXX 2/3/2025 1:11 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1321
1. All internal investment staff of the Kentucky Public Pensions Authority,
and investment consultants shall adhere to the Code of Ethics and
Standards of Professional Conduct, and all board trustees shall adhere to
the Code of Conduct for Members of a Pension Scheme Governing
Body. All codes cited in this subparagraph are promulgated by the CFA
Institute;
2. Investment managers shall comply with all applicable provisions of the
federal Investment Advisers Act of 1940, as amended, and the rules and
regulations promulgated thereunder, and shall comply with all other
applicable federal securities statutes and related rules and regulations
that apply to investment managers; and
3. Proxy advisers and proxy voting services shall comply with all
applicable provisions of the Investment Advisers Act of 1940, as
amended, and the rules and regulations promulgated thereunder, and
shall comply with all other federal statutes and related rules and
regulations that apply to proxy advisers and proxy voting services.
(e) No contract or agreement, whether made in writing or not, shall in any
manner waive, restrict, or limit a fiduciary's liability as to any of the duties
imposed by this section. Any agreement shall specify that it is made in the
Commonwealth and governed by the laws of the Commonwealth.
(2) The board, through adopted written policies, shall maintain ownership and control
over its assets held in its unitized managed custodial account.
(3) The board, in keeping with its responsibility as the trustee and wherever feasible,
shall give priority to the investment of funds in obligations calculated to improve
the industrial development and enhance the economic welfare of the
Commonwealth.
(4) The contents of real estate appraisals, engineering or feasibility estimates, and
Page 29 of 39
XXXX 2/3/2025 1:11 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1321
evaluations made by or for the system relative to the acquisition or disposition of
property, until such time as all of the property has been acquired or sold, shall be
excluded from the application of KRS 61.870 to 61.884 and shall be subject to
inspection only upon order of a court of competent jurisdiction.
(5) (a) Based upon market value at the time of purchase, the board shall limit the
amount of assets managed by any one (1) active or passive investment
manager to fifteen percent (15%) of the assets in the pension and insurance
funds.
(b) The board may invest fund assets in exchange traded products as defined in
Section 1 of this Act.
(6) All contracts for the investment or management of assets of the system shall not be
subject to KRS Chapters 45, 45A, 56, and 57. Instead, the board shall conduct the
following process to develop and adopt an investment procurement policy with
which all prospective contracts for the investment or management of assets of the
system shall comply:
(a) The board shall consult with the secretary of the Finance and Administration
Cabinet or his or her designee to develop an investment procurement policy,
which shall be written to meet best practices in investment management
procurement;
(b) Thirty (30) days prior to adoption, the board shall tender the preliminary
investment procurement policy to the secretary of the Finance and
Administration Cabinet or his or her designee for review and comment;
(c) Upon receipt of comments from the secretary of the Finance and
Administration Cabinet or his or her designee, the board shall choose to adopt
or not adopt any recommended changes;
(d) Upon adoption, the board shall tender the final investment procurement policy
to the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet or his or her
Page 30 of 39
XXXX 2/3/2025 1:11 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1321
designee;
(e) No later than thirty (30) days after receipt of the investment procurement
policy, the secretary or his or her designee shall certify whether the board's
investment procurement policy meets or does not meet best practices for
investment management procurement; and
(f) Any amendments to the investment procurement policy shall adhere to the
requirements set forth by paragraphs (b) to (e) of this subsection.
(7) (a) The board shall adopt written proxy voting guidelines, which are consistent
with the fiduciary duties and other requirements of this section.
(b) The board shall not adopt the recommendations of a proxy adviser or proxy
voting service and shall not allow such proxy adviser or proxy voting service
to vote on behalf of the system, unless the proxy adviser or proxy voting
service acknowledges in writing and accepts under contract its duties under
this section and commits to follow the board-adopted proxy voting guidelines
when voting the system's shares in order to comply with the board's fiduciary
duties and other responsibilities under this section.
(c) All shares held by or on behalf of the system, and which the system is entitled
to vote under state, federal, or common laws, shall be voted according to the
proxy voting guidelines adopted by the board and subject to the fiduciary
duties and other requirements of this section by:
1. The board, the investment committee of the board, or an employee or
employees of the Authority who are fiduciaries under subsection (1) of
this section and are appointed or otherwise authorized by the board; or
2. A proxy adviser or proxy voting service that acknowledges in writing
and accepts under contract its duties under this section and commits to
follow the board-adopted proxy voting guidelines when voting the
system's shares in order to comply with the board's fiduciary duties and
Page 31 of 39
XXXX 2/3/2025 1:11 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1321
other responsibilities under this section.
(d) All proxy votes shall be reported at least quarterly to the board. For each vote,
the report shall provide:
1. The vote caption;
2. The date of the vote;
3. The company's name;
4. The vote cast for the system;
5. The recommendation of the company's management; and
6. If applicable, the recommendation of the proxy adviser or proxy voting
service.
Section 13. KRS 161.430 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) The board of trustees shall be the trustee of the funds of the retirement system
and shall have full power and responsibility for the purchase, sale, exchange,
transfer, or other disposition of the investments and moneys of the retirement
system. The board shall, by administrative regulation, establish investment
policies and procedures to carry out their responsibilities.
(b) 1. The board shall contract with experienced competent investment
managers to invest and manage assets of the system. The board may also
employ qualified investment staff to advise it on investment matters and
to invest and manage assets of the system not to exceed fifty percent
(50%) of the system's assets. The board may contract with one (1) or
more general investment consultants, as well as specialized investment
consultants, to advise it on investment matters.
2. All internal investment staff and investment consultants shall adhere to
the Code of Ethics and Standards of Professional Conduct, and all board
trustees shall adhere to the Code of Conduct for Members of a Pension
Scheme Governing Body, promulgated by the CFA Institute. Investment
Page 32 of 39
XXXX 2/3/2025 1:11 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1321
managers shall comply with the federal Investment Advisers Act of
1940, as amended, and the rules and regulations promulgated thereunder
and shall comply with all other applicable federal securities statutes and
related rules and regulations that apply to investment managers.
3. No investment manager shall manage more than forty percent (40%) of
the funds of the retirement system.
4. The board may invest assets of the system in exchange traded products
as defined in Section 1 of this Act.
(c) The board may appoint an investment committee to act for the board in all
matters of investment, subject to the approval of the board of trustees. The
board of trustees, in keeping with their responsibilities as trustees and
wherever consistent with their fiduciary responsibilities, shall give priority to
the investment of funds in obligations calculated to improve the industrial
development and enhance the economic welfare of the Commonwealth.
Toward this end, the board shall develop procedures for informing the
business community of the potential for in-state investments by the retirement
fund, accepting and evaluating applications for the in-state investment of
funds, and working with members of the business community in executing in-
state investments which are consistent with the board's fiduciary
responsibilities. The board shall include in the criteria it uses to evaluate in-
state investments their potential for creating new employment opportunities
and adding to the total job pool in Kentucky. The board may cooperate with
the board of trustees of Kentucky Retirement Systems in developing its
program and procedures, and shall report to the Legislative Research
Commission annually on its progress in placing in-state investments. The first
report shall be submitted by October 1, 1991, and subsequent reports shall be
submitted by October 1 of each year thereafter. The report shall include the
Page 33 of 39
XXXX 2/3/2025 1:11 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1321
number of applications for in-state investment received, the nature of the
investments proposed, the amount requested, the amount invested, and the
percentage of applications which resulted in investments.
(2) (a) For the purposes of this subsection:
1. "Solely in the interest of the members and beneficiaries" shall be
determined using only pecuniary factors and shall not include any
purpose to further a nonpecuniary interest;
2. "Pecuniary factor" means a consideration having a direct and material
connection to the financial risk or financial return of an investment;
3. A "material connection" is established if there is a substantial likelihood
that a reasonable investor would consider it important in determining the
financial risk or the financial return of an investment;
4. "Nonpecuniary interest" includes but is not limited to an environmental,
social, political, or ideological interest which does not have a direct and
material connection to the financial risk or financial return of an
investment; and
5. "Investment manager" and "investment consultant" shall have the same
definition attributed to "investment adviser" under the federal
Investment Advisers Act of 1940, 15 U.S.C. sec. 80b-2.
(b) The board members, investment managers, investment consultants, or other
fiduciaries, and proxy advisers shall discharge their duties with respect to the
assets of the system solely in the interests of the active contributing members
and annuitants and:
1. For the exclusive purpose of providing benefits to members and
annuitants and defraying reasonable expenses of administering the
system;
2. With the care, skill, prudence, and diligence under the circumstances
Page 34 of 39
XXXX 2/3/2025 1:11 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1321
then prevailing that a prudent person acting in a like capacity and
familiar with these matters would use in the conduct of an enterprise of
a like character and with like aims;
3. By diversifying the investments of the plan so as to minimize the risk of
large losses, unless under the circumstances it is clearly prudent not to
do so; and
4. In accordance with the federal, state, and common laws, administrative
regulations, and other instruments governing the system and fiduciaries.
(c) Evidence that a fiduciary has considered or acted on a nonpecuniary interest
shall include but is not limited to:
1. Statements, explanations, reports, or correspondence;
2. Communications with portfolio companies;
3. Statements of principles or policies, whether made individually or
jointly;
4. Votes of shares or proxies; or
5. Coalitions, initiatives, agreements, or commitments to which the
fiduciary is a participant, affiliate, or signatory.
(3) (a) In choosing and contracting for professional investment management and
consulting services, the board shall do so prudently and in the interest of the
members and annuitants. Any contract that the board makes with an
investment manager shall set forth policies and guidelines of the board with
reference to standard rating services and specific criteria for determining the
quality of investments. Expenses directly related to investment management
and consulting services shall be financed from the guarantee fund in amounts
approved by the board.
(b) An investment manager or consultant appointed under this section shall
acknowledge in writing his or her fiduciary responsibilities to the fund. To be
Page 35 of 39
XXXX 2/3/2025 1:11 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1321
eligible for appointment, an investment manager, consultant, or an affiliate,
shall be:
1. Registered under the Federal Investment Advisers Act of 1940; or
2. A bank as defined by that Act; or
3. An insurance company qualified to perform investment services under
the laws of more than one (1) state.
(c) Proxy advisers and proxy voting services shall comply with all applicable
provisions of the Investment Advisers Act of 1940, as amended, and the rules
and regulations promulgated thereunder, and shall comply with all other
federal statutes and related rules and regulations that apply to proxy advisers
and proxy voting services.
(d) No contract or agreement, whether made in writing or not, shall in any
manner waive, restrict, or limit a fiduciary's liability as to any of the duties
imposed by this section. Any agreement shall specify that it is made in the
Commonwealth and governed by the laws of the Commonwealth.
(4) No investment or disbursement of funds shall be made unless authorized by the
board of trustees, except that the board, in order to ensure timely market
transactions, shall establish investment guidelines and may permit its staff and
investment managers who are employed or under contract with the board pursuant
to this section to execute purchases and sales of investment instruments within
those guidelines without prior board approval.
(5) In discharging his or her administrative duties under this section, a trustee shall
strive to administer the retirement system in an efficient and cost-effective manner
for the taxpayers of the Commonwealth of Kentucky.
(6) Notwithstanding any other provision of KRS 161.220 to 161.716, no funds of the
Teachers' Retirement System, including fees and commissions paid to an
investment manager, private fund, or company issuing securities, who manages
Page 36 of 39
XXXX 2/3/2025 1:11 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1321
systems assets, shall be used to pay fees and commissions to placement agents. For
purposes of this subsection, "placement agent" means a third-party individual, who
is not an employee, or firm, wholly or partially owned by the entity being hired,
who solicits investments on behalf of an investment manager, private fund, or
company issuing securities.
(7) All contracts for the investment or management of assets of the system shall not be
subject to KRS Chapters 45, 45A, 56, and 57. Instead, the board shall conduct the
following process to develop and adopt an investment procurement policy with
which all prospective contracts for the investment or management of assets of the
system shall comply:
(a) On or before July 1, 2017, the board shall consult with the secretary of the
Finance and Administration Cabinet or his or her designee to develop an
investment procurement policy, which shall be written to meet best practices
in investment management procurement;
(b) Thirty (30) days prior to adoption, the board shall tender the preliminary
investment procurement policy to the secretary of the Finance and
Administration Cabinet or his or her designee for review and comment;
(c) Upon receipt of comments from the secretary of the Finance and
Administration Cabinet or his or her designee, the board shall choose to adopt
or not adopt any recommended changes;
(d) Upon adoption, the board shall tender the final investment procurement policy
to the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet or his or her
designee;
(e) No later than thirty (30) days after receipt of the investment procurement
policy, the secretary or his or her designee shall certify whether the board's
investment procurement policy meets or does not meet best practices for
investment management procurement; and
Page 37 of 39
XXXX 2/3/2025 1:11 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1321
(f) Any amendments to the investment procurement policy shall adhere to the
requirements set forth by paragraphs (b) to (e) of this subsection.
(8) (a) The board shall adopt written proxy voting guidelines which are consistent
with the fiduciary duties and other requirements of this section.
(b) The board shall not adopt the recommendations of a proxy adviser or proxy
voting service and shall not allow such proxy adviser or proxy voting service
to vote on behalf of the system, unless the proxy adviser or proxy voting
service acknowledges in writing and accepts under contract its duties under
this section and commits to follow the board-adopted proxy voting guidelines
when voting the system's shares in order to comply with the board's fiduciary
duties and other responsibilities under this section.
(c) All shares held by or on behalf of the system, and which the system is entitled
to vote under state, federal, or common laws, shall be voted according to the
proxy voting guidelines adopted by the board and subject to the fiduciary
duties and other requirements of this section by:
1. The board, the investment committee of the board, or an employee or
employees of the system who are fiduciaries under this section and are
appointed or otherwise authorized by the board; or
2. A proxy adviser or proxy voting service that acknowledges in writing
and accepts under contract its duties under this section and commits to
follow the board-adopted proxy voting guidelines when voting the
system's shares in order to comply with the board's fiduciary duties and
other responsibilities under this section.
(d) All proxy votes shall be reported at least quarterly to the board. For each vote,
the report shall provide:
1. The vote caption;
2. The date of the vote;
Page 38 of 39
XXXX 2/3/2025 1:11 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1321
3. The company's name;
4. The vote cast for the system;
5. The recommendation of the company's management; and
6. If applicable, the recommendation of the proxy adviser or proxy voting
service.
Section 14. This Act may be cited as the Inflation Protection Act of 2025.
Page 39 of 39
XXXX 2/3/2025 1:11 PM Jacketed